Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-706
Fire prevention instruction; requirements.

In addition to any required monthly fire drill, every public, private, denominational, or parochial school shall provide regular periods of instruction in the subject of fire dangers and in methods of fire prevention.

Laws 1911, c. 126, § 2, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 6851;

C.S.1922, § 6422;

C.S.1929, § 79-1202;

R.S.1943, § 79-1202;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 161, p. 746;

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 21;

Laws 1982, LB 933, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 749, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,123;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 380.

For school drills under supervision of the State Fire Marshal, see section 81-527.